Vermont, session 2025-2026, S305.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Municipal Zoning * * *
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4412 is amended to read:
§ 4412. REQUIRED PROVISIONS AND PROHIBITED EFFECTS
Notwithstanding any existing bylaw, the following land development
provisions shall apply in every municipality:
(1) Equal treatment of housing and required provisions for affordable
housing.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 2 of 27
* * *
(B) Except as provided in subdivisions 4414(1)(E) and (F) of this
title, no bylaw shall have the effect of excluding mobile homes, modular
housing, or prefabricated housing from any district that allows year-round
residential development in the municipality, except upon the same terms and
conditions as conventional housing is excluded. A municipality may establish
specific site standards in the bylaws to regulate individual sites within
preexisting mobile home parks with regard to distances between structures and
other standards as necessary to ensure public health, safety, and welfare,
provided the standards do not have the effect of prohibiting the replacement of
mobile homes on existing lots.
* * *
(E) Except for flood hazard and fluvial erosion area bylaws adopted
pursuant to section 4424 of this title, no bylaw shall have the effect of
excluding as a permitted use one accessory dwelling unit that is located within
or appurtenant to a single-family dwelling on an owner-occupied lot. A bylaw
shall require a single-family dwelling with an accessory dwelling unit to be
subject to the same review, dimensional, or other controls as required for a
single-family dwelling without an accessory dwelling unit. The criteria for
conversion of an existing detached nonresidential building to habitable space
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 3 of 27
for an accessory dwelling unit shall not be more restrictive than the criteria
used for a single-family dwelling without an accessory dwelling unit.
* * *
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 4303 is amended to read:
§ 4303. DEFINITIONS
The following definitions shall apply throughout this chapter unless the
context otherwise requires:
* * *
(42)(A) An area “served by municipal sewer and water infrastructure”
means an area within one-quarter mile of a road with water and sewer lines
where there is capacity or capacity is being added imminently to accommodate
housing or:
(i) an area where residential connections and expansions are
available to municipal water and direct and indirect discharge wastewater
systems and not prohibited by:
(I) State regulations or permits;
(II) identified capacity constraints; or
(III) municipally adopted service and capacity agreements; or
(ii) an area established by the municipality by ordinance or bylaw
where residential connections and expansions are available to municipal water
and direct and indirect discharge wastewater systems and which may exclude:
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 4 of 27
(I) flood hazard or inundation areas as established by statute,
river corridors or fluvial erosion areas as established by statute, shorelands,
areas within a zoning district or overlay district the purpose of which is natural
resource protection, and wherever year-round residential development is not
allowed;
(II) areas with identified service limits established by State
regulations or permits, identified capacity constraints, or municipally adopted
service and capacity agreements;
(III) areas served by sewer and water to address an identified
community-scale public health hazard or environmental hazard;
(IV) areas serving a mobile home park that is not within an area
planned for year-round residential growth;
(V) areas serving an industrial site or park;
(VI) areas where service lines are located to serve the areas
described in subdivisions (III)–(V) of this subdivision (ii), but no connections
or expansions are permitted; or
(VII) areas that, through an approved Planned Unit
Development under section 4417 of this title or Transfer of Development
Rights under section 4423 of this title, prohibit year-round residential
development.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 5 of 27
(B) Municipally adopted areas served by municipal sewer and water
infrastructure that limit sewer and water connections and expansions shall not
result in the unequal treatment of housing by discriminating against a year-
round residential use or housing type otherwise allowed in this chapter.
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 4412a is added to read:
§ 4412a. UNION LABOR
Any residential housing construction that uses union labor for construction
may exceed a density bonus in a zoning bylaw by an additional 20 percent.
* * * Zoning Appeals * * *
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 4471 is amended to read:
§ 4471. APPEAL TO ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
(a) Participation required. A n interested person who has participated in a
municipal regulatory proceeding authorized under this title may appeal a
decision rendered in that proceeding by an appropriate municipal panel to the
Environmental Division. Participation in a local regulatory proceeding shall
consist of offering, through oral or written testimony, evidence or a statement
of concern related to the subject of the proceeding. An appeal from a decision
of the appropriate municipal panel, or from a decision of the municipal
legislative body under subsection 4415(d) of this title, shall be taken in such
manner as the Supreme Court may by rule provide for appeals from State
agencies governed by 3 V.S.A. §§ 801-816, unless the decision is an
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 6 of 27
appropriate municipal panel decision which the municipality has elected to be
subject to review on the record. [Repealed.]
(b) Appeal on the record. If the municipal legislative body has determined
(or been instructed by the voters) to provide that appeals of certain appropriate
municipal panel determinations shall be on the record, has defined what
magnitude or nature of development proposal shall be subject to the production
of an adequate record by the panel, and has provided that the Municipal
Administrative Procedure Act shall apply in these instances, then an appeal
from such a decision of an appropriate municipal panel shall be taken on the
record in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. [Repealed.]
(c) Notice. Notice of the appeal shall be filed by certified mailing, with
fees, to the Environmental Division and by mailing a copy to the municipal
clerk or the administrative officer, if so designated, who shall supply a list of
interested persons to the appellant within five working days. Upon receipt of
the list of interested persons, the appellant shall, by certified mail, provide a
copy of the notice of appeal to every interested person, and, if any one or more
of those persons are not then parties to the appeal, upon motion they shall be
granted leave by the Division to intervene. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 5. 24 V.S.A. § 4472 is amended to read:
§ 4472. EXCLUSIVITY OF REMEDY; FINALITY
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 7 of 27
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the
exclusive remedy of an interested person with respect to There shall be no
appeal of any decision or act taken, or any failure to act, under this chapter or
with respect to any one or more of the provisions of any plan or bylaw shall be
the appeal to the appropriate panel under section 4465 of this title, and the
appeal to the Environmental Division from an adverse decision upon such
appeal under section 4471 of this title. The appeal to the Environmental
Division, if not on the record, as allowed under section 4471 of this title, shall
be governed by the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure and such interested
person shall be entitled to a de novo trial in the Environmental Division. If the
appeal to the Environmental Division is on the record, according to the
provisions of section 4471 of this title, it shall be governed by the Vermont
Rules of Civil Procedure. Whether proceeding on the record or de novo, the
court shall have and may exercise all powers and authorities of a Superior
Court. There shall be no appeal of an act or decision under this chapter related
to a permit application for a project that has been approved by a vote by the
municipality.
* * *
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 8503 is amended to read:
§ 8503. APPLICABILITY
* * *
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 8 of 27
(c) This chapter shall govern all appeals arising under 24 V.S.A. chapter
117, the planning and zoning chapter. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(b) Planning and zoning chapter appeals.
(1) Within 30 days of the date of the act or decision, an interested person,
as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4465, who has participated as defined in 24 V.S.A. §
4471 in the municipal regulatory proceeding under that chapter may appeal to
the Environmental Division an act or decision made under that chapter by a
board of adjustment, a planning commission, or a development review board;
provided, however, that decisions of a development review board under 24
V.S.A. § 4420 with respect to local Act 250 review of municipal impacts are
not subject to appeal but shall serve as presumptions under chapter 151 of this
title.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, an interested
person may appeal an act or decision under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 if the
Environmental judge determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
obtaining interested person status or participating in the proceeding;
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 9 of 27
(B) the decision being appealed is the grant or denial of interested
person status; or
(C) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal was disallowed. [Repealed.]
* * *
(f) Stays.
(1) The filing of an appeal shall automatically stay the act or decision in
the following situations:
(A) acts or decisions involving stream alteration permits or shoreline
encroachment permits issued by the Secretary;
(B) the denial of interested person status by a board of adjustment,
planning commission, or development review board.
* * *
(h) De novo hearing. The Environmental Division, applying the
substantive standards that were applicable before the tribunal appealed from,
shall hold a de novo hearing on those issues that have been appealed, except in
the case of:
(1) a decision being appealed on the record pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
chapter 117;
(2) a decision of the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation
under section 2625 of this title being appealed on the record, in which case the
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 10 of 27
court shall affirm the decision, unless it finds that the Commissioner did not
have reasonable grounds on which to base the decision.
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:
(1) there shall be no appeal from a District Commission decision when
the Commission has issued a permit and no hearing was requested or held, or
no motion to alter was filed following the issuance of an administrative
amendment;
(2) a municipal decision regarding whether a particular application
qualifies for a recorded hearing under 24 V.S.A. § 4471(b) shall not be subject
to appeal; and
(3) if a District Commission issues a partial decision under subsection
6086(b) of this title, any appeal of that decision must be taken within 30 days
following the date of that decision; and.
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division to issue a decision
on a case regarding an appeal of an appropriate municipal panel decision under
24 V.S.A. chapter 117 within 90 days following the close of the hearing.
[Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 11 of 27
(n) Intervention. Any person may intervene in a pending appeal if that
person:
(1) appeared as a party in the action appealed from and retained party
status;
(2) is a party by right;
(3) is the Land Use Review Board;
(4) is a person aggrieved, as defined in this chapter; or
(5) qualifies as an “interested person,” as established in 24 V.S.A. §
4465, with respect to appeals under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117; or [Repealed.]
(6) meets the standard for intervention established in the Vermont Rules
of Civil Procedure.
* * *
* * * Act 250 * * *
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 6033 is amended to read:
§ 6033. REGIONAL PLAN FUTURE LAND USE MAP REVIEW
* * *
(c) To obtain a Tier 1B area status under this section, the regional planning
commission shall demonstrate to the Board that the municipalities with Tier 1B
areas meet the following requirements as included in subdivision 24 V.S.A.
§ 4348a(a)(12)(C):
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 12 of 27
(1) The municipality has not requested to have opt out of having the area
mapped for Tier 1B. A municipality may request to opt out of Tier 1B area
status by submitting a resolution passed by the municipality to the relevant
regional planning commission and the Board.
* * *
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 6086 is amended to read:
§ 6086. ISSUANCE OF PERMIT; CONDITIONS AND CRITERIA
* * *
(d) State and local permits; presumptions.
(1) State permits.
(A) The Land Use Review Board may by rule A District Commission
shall allow the acceptance of a permit or permits or approval of any State
agency with respect to subdivisions (a)(1) through (5)(a)(1)–(5) of this section
or in lieu of evidence by the applicant. The presumption established by this
subdivision (1) shall only apply to the issues addressed as a part of the terms of
the permit.
(B) In the case of permits issued by the Agency of Natural
Resources, technical determinations of the Agency shall be accorded
substantial deference by the District Commissions.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 13 of 27
(C) The acceptance of such permit or permits shall create a
presumption that the application is not detrimental to the public health and
welfare with respect to the specific requirement for which it is accepted.
(2) Municipal permits.
(A) The Board may by rule allow a permit or permits of a specified
municipal government with respect to subdivisions (a)(1) through (7)(a)(1)–(7)
and (9) and (10) of this section, or a combination of such permits or approvals,
in lieu of evidence by the applicant. The presumption established by this
subdivision (2) shall only apply to the issues addressed as a part of the terms of
the permit.
(B) A District Commission, in accordance with rules adopted by the
Board, shall accept determinations issued by a development review board
under the provisions of 24 V.S.A. § 4420, with respect to local Act 250 review
of municipal impacts.
(C) The acceptance of such approval, positive determinations, permit,
or permits shall create a presumption that the application is not detrimental to
the public health and welfare with respect to the specific requirement for which
it is accepted. In the case of approvals and permits issued by the Agency of
Natural Resources, technical determinations of the Agency shall be accorded
substantial deference by the Commissions. The acceptance of negative
determinations issued by a development review board under the provisions of
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 14 of 27
24 V.S.A. § 4420, with respect to local Act 250 review of municipal impacts,
shall create a presumption that the application is detrimental to the public
health and welfare with respect to the specific requirement for which it is
accepted. Any determinations, positive or negative, under the provisions of 24
V.S.A. § 4420 shall create presumptions only to the extent that the impacts
under the criteria are limited to the municipality issuing the decision. Such a
rule may be revoked or amended pursuant to the procedures set forth in 3
V.S.A., chapter 25, the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act.
(3) Rebutting presumptions.
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3),
permits may be rebutted by evidence that is relevant and admissible.
(B) With respect to permits issued by a State agency that provides
notice, the ability to comment, and a right to appeal, prior to accepting
evidence to rebut a permit the Commission shall determine that the evidence:
(i) was not presented to the State agency issuing the permit that
resulted in the presumption;
(ii) was not capable of being discovered by due diligence prior to
the issuance of the permit;
(iii) is material; and
(iv) is not merely cumulative.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 15 of 27
(4) Rulemaking. The Board shall adopt rules to administer the
requirements of this subsection. The rules adopted by the Board shall not
approve the acceptance of a permit or approval of such an agency or a permit
of a municipal government unless it satisfies the appropriate requirements of
subsection (a) of this section.
* * *
(i) Contingent permit. A District Commission may issue a permit
contingent upon the applicant receiving permits from the Agency of Natural
Resources or other State agency.
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 is amended to read:
§ 6001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
(iv) The construction of housing projects such as cooperatives,
condominiums, or dwellings, or construction or maintenance of mobile homes
or mobile home parks, with 10 or more units, constructed or maintained on a
tract or tracts of land, owned or controlled by a person, within a radius of five
miles of any point on any involved land and within any continuous period of
five years. However:
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 16 of 27
* * *
(52) “Involved land” means those portions of any tract or tracts of land
to be physically altered and upon which construction of improvements will
occur for commercial housing purposes, including land that is incidental to the
use such as lawns, parking lots, driveways, leach fields, and accessory
buildings, bearing some relationship to the land that is actually used in the
construction of improvements, such that there is a demonstrable likelihood that
the impact on the values sought to be protected by Act 250 will be
substantially affected by reason of the relationship. Where a project is to be
completed in stages according to a plan, or it is evident under the
circumstances that the project is incidental to or a part of a larger undertaking,
all land involved in the entire project shall be included for the purposes of
determining jurisdiction.
* * * Agency of Natural Resources * * *
Sec. 11. 3 V.S.A. § 2811 is added to read:
§ 2811. APPROVED ENGINEERS, CONSULTANTS, AND EXPERTS
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall establish criteria for certifying
engineers, consultants, and other experts as approved for purposes of providing
permitting data or submitting permit applications for any permitting program
administered by the Agency of Natural Resources. The criteria may include
licensing requirements, education requirements, prior work history, and other
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 17 of 27
criteria deemed appropriate by the Secretary as indicating the necessary
expertise to provide accurate permitting data or permitting applications.
(b) Upon publication of the criteria for certifying approved engineers,
consultants, and other experts under subsection (a) of this section, the
Secretary of Natural Resources shall accept applications for certification.
Applications shall be submitted on a form or through a process established by
the Secretary.
(c) Upon certification under this section, permitting data or information
submitted by a certified engineer, consultant, or other expert shall be presumed
accurate and any permit application submitted by a certified engineer,
consultant, or other expert shall receive expedited review.
Sec. 12. 3 V.S.A. § 2822(g) is amended to read:
(g)(1) The Secretary shall make all practical efforts to process permits in a
prompt manner and approve or deny any application for a permit to the Agency
of Natural Resources within three months after the date an application is
determined to be administratively complete. The Secretary shall establish time
limits for the processing of each permit as well as procedures and time periods
within which to notify applicants whether an application is complete. Any
denial of an application for a permit shall be based on clear, articulated
standards set forth in a denial letter to the permit applicant.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 18 of 27
(2) The Secretary shall report no later than the third Tuesday of each
annual legislative session to the General Assembly by electronic submission.
The annual report shall assess the Agency’s performance in meeting the time
limits under subdivision (1) of this subsection for processing permit
applications; identify areas that hinder effective Agency performance; list fees
collected for each permit; summarize changes made by the Agency to improve
performance; describe staffing needs for the coming year; certify that the
revenue from the fees collected is at least equal to the costs associated with
those positions; and discuss the operation of the Agency during the preceding
fiscal year and the future goals and objectives of the Agency. The provisions
of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report
to be made under this subsection. This report is in addition to the fee report
and request required by 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 6.
* * * Common Interest Communities * * *
Sec. 13. 27A V.S.A. § 1-204 is amended to read:
§ 1-204. PREEXISTING COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITIES
(a)(1) Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, the following
sections and subdivisions of this title apply to a common interest community
created in this State before January 1, 1999: sections 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-
107, 2-103, 2-104, and 2-121,; subdivisions 3-102(a)(1) through (6)3-
102(a)(1)–(6) and (11) through (16), (11)–(16); and sections 3-111, 3-116, 3-
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 19 of 27
118, 4-109, and 4-117 to the extent necessary to construe the applicable
sections. The sections and subdivisions described in this subdivision apply
only to events and circumstances occurring after December 31, 1998, and do
not invalidate existing provisions of the declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of
those common interest communities.
* * *
(3) Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, section 3-125 of
this title shall apply to a common interest community created in this State
before January 1, 1999. Section 3-125 applies only to events and
circumstances occurring after June 30, 2026, and does not invalidate existing
provisions of the declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of those common interest
communities.
* * *
Sec. 14. 27A V.S.A. § 3-125 is added to read:
§ 3-125. PROHIBITED USES DISALLOWED
(a) Leasing units.
(1) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed,
contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale
of any interest in a common interest community, and any provision of a
governing document associated with a common interest community, such as a
declaration, bylaw, or rule, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 20 of 27
restricts a unit owner from leasing the individual unit owner’s unit for
residential purposes or is in conflict with this section is void and
unenforceable.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent or prohibit any deed,
contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale
of any interest in a common interest community, and any provision of a
governing document associated with a common interest community, such as a
declaration, bylaw, or rule, from preventing the subleasing of a unit or
restricting the leasing of residential units as authorized by subdivision 3-
120(f)(3) of this title.
(3) This subsection shall not be interpreted to authorize transient
occupancy in a hotel, motel, or lodgings that would subject the occupant to a
tax levied under 32 V.S.A. chapter 225.
(4) This subsection shall not be interpreted to authorize a unit owner to
lease a unit as a short-term rental as that term is defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4301.
(5) This subsection shall not apply to common interest communities
reserved exclusively for nonresidential purposes.
(b) Family child care home.
(1) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed,
contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale
of any interest in a common interest community, and any provision of a
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 21 of 27
governing document associated with a common interest community, such as a
declaration, bylaw, or rule, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably
restricts a unit owner from operating a family child care home, as that term is
defined in 33 V.S.A. § 3511, within the unit owner’s unit is void and
unenforceable.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, a family child
care home operating within a common interest community shall comply with
applicable federal and State laws relating to the regulation of family child care
homes.
(c) Zoning; land use requirements. Unit owners shall comply with federal,
State, and local laws related to applicable zoning requirements, land use
requirements, and other covenants, conditions, and restrictions.
(d) Leasehold common interest communities. This section shall not apply
to leasehold common interest communities.
* * * Positive Rental Payment Pilot Program * * *
Sec. 15. POSITIVE RENTAL PAYMENT CREDIT REPORTING PILOT
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Contractor” means the third-party vendor that the State Treasurer’s
Office contracts with to administer the pilot program described in this section.
(2) “Dwelling unit” has the same meaning as in 9 V.S.A. § 4451(3).
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 22 of 27
(3) “Participant property owner” means a landlord who has agreed in
writing to participate in the pilot program and has satisfied the requirements
described in subsection (c) of this section.
(4) “Participant tenant” means a tenant who has elected to participate in
the pilot program and whose landlord is a participant property owner.
(5) “Rental payment information” means information concerning a
participant tenant’s timely payment of rent. “Rent payment information” does
not include information concerning a participant tenant’s payment or
nonpayment of fees.
(b) Pilot program creation.
(1) The State Treasurer shall create and implement a two-year positive
rental payment reporting pilot program to facilitate the reporting of rent
payment information from participant tenants to consumer reporting agencies.
(2) On or before May 1, 2027, the State Treasurer shall contract with a
third party to administer a positive rental payment pilot program and facilitate
the transmission of rent reporting information from a participant property
owner to a consumer reporting agency. The third-party administrator shall be
required to:
(A) enter into an agreement with one or more participant property
owners in the State in accordance with the requirements of this section for
participation in the pilot program;
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 23 of 27
(B) ensure that information to a credit reporting agency includes only
rent payment information after the date on which the participant tenant elected
to participate in the pilot program;
(C) establish a standard form for a participant tenant to use to elect to
participate or cease participation in the pilot program, which shall include a
statement that the tenant’s participation is voluntary and that a participant may
cease participating in the pilot program at any time and for any reason by
providing notice to the participant’s landlord; and
(D) offer an optional financial education course for participant
tenants.
(c) Program agreements. A participant property owner shall agree in
writing:
(1) to participate in the pilot program for the duration of the program;
(2) not to charge a participant tenant for participation in the pilot
program;
(3) to comply with the requirements of the program;
(4) to provide information as required by the State Treasurer concerning
the implementation of the pilot program; and
(5) to assist in the recruitment of tenants to participate in the pilot
program.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 24 of 27
(d) Program participants. On or before June 1, 2027, the contractor shall,
in coordination with the State Treasurer, recruit not more than 10 participant
property owners and, to the extent practicable, not fewer than 100 participant
tenants to participate in the pilot program. The contractor shall seek to select
participant tenants from populations that are under-served and under-
represented in home ownership. The contractor shall also seek to recruit
participant landlords who offer:
(1) a variety of types of dwelling units for rent, including dwelling units
of various sizes;
(2) dwelling units for rent that are located in geographically diverse
areas of the State; and
(3) at least five dwelling units for rent.
(e) Termination. The State Treasurer may terminate the pilot program at
any time in the Treasurer’s sole discretion or terminate participation of a
participant property owner for failure to comply with the requirements of the
program.
(f) Reports.
(1) On or before November 1, 2028, the State Treasurer shall submit an
interim report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs regarding
the findings of the pilot program. The report shall include:
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 25 of 27
(A) the number of participant tenants, including information
regarding the demographic makeup of participant tenants, such as race,
ethnicity, gender, income, and age, as voluntarily provided by the participants;
(B) the number of participant tenants who ceased participating in the
program;
(C) a breakdown of costs of administering the program, including the
monthly costs associated with rent reporting;
(D) a description of challenges faced by the participant property
owners and participant tenants during the pilot program;
(E) an analysis of the outcomes of rent reporting on participant
tenant’s credit scores; and
(F) recommendations for legislative action, including proposed
statutory language and an appropriation for associated costs.
(2) On or before November 1, 2029, the State Treasurer shall submit a
final report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs regarding
the findings of the pilot program. The report shall include an update to the
information required in the interim report.
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 26 of 27
Sec. 16. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2027, $100,000.00 shall be appropriated from the General
Fund to the State Treasurer to implement the rental payment pilot program
established in Sec. 15 of this act.
* * * Taxes * * *
Sec. 17. 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21)(C) is amended to read:
(C) decreased by the following exemptions and deductions:
* * *
(iv) an amount equal to the itemized deduction for medical
expenses taken at the federal level by the taxpayer, under 26 U.S.C. § 213:
(I) minus the amount of the Vermont standard deduction and
Vermont personal exemptions taken by the taxpayer under this subdivision
(C); and
(II) minus any amount deducted at the federal level that is
attributable to the payment of an entrance fee or recurring monthly payment
made to a continuing care retirement community regulated under 8 V.S.A.
chapter 151, which exceeds the deductibility limits for premiums paid during
the taxable year on qualified long-term care insurance contracts under 26
U.S.C. 213(d)(10)(A).
VT LEG #385810 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.305
2026 Page 27 of 27
* * * CHIP * * *
Sec. 18. 24 V.S.A. § 1909 is amended to read:
§ 1909. HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE AGREEMENT
(a) The housing infrastructure agreement for a housing infrastructure
project shall:
* * *
(3) obligate the tax increments retained pursuant to section 1910c of this
subchapter for not more than the financing and related costs for the housing
infrastructure project; and
(4) provide that any housing unit within the housing development be
offered exclusively as a primary residence until all indebtedness for the
housing infrastructure project of which the housing development is part has
been retired, provided that this condition shall be satisfied by biennially
providing a landlord certificate or homestead declaration; and [Repealed.]
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 19. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385810 v.3